Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1149.
do enact as follows:SB1149,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1149,29Section 2. 20.435 (1) (fp) of the statutes is created to read:SB1149,2,121020.435 (1) (fp) Prescription drug cost reporting by manufacturers. Biennially, 11the amounts in the schedule to administer prescription drug cost reporting under s. 12146.901.SB1149,31Section 3. 146.901 of the statutes is created to read:SB1149,3,32146.901 Prescription drug cost reporting by manufacturers. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:SB1149,3,54(a) “Brand-name drug” means a prescription drug approved under 21 USC 5355 (b) or 42 USC 262.SB1149,3,66(b) “Generic drug” means a prescription drug approved under 21 USC 355 (j).SB1149,3,97(c) “Manufacturer” has the meaning given in s. 450.01 (12). “Manufacturer” 8does not include an entity that is engaged only in the dispensing, as defined in s. 9450.01 (7), of a brand-name drug or a generic drug.SB1149,3,1310(d) “Manufacturer-sponsored assistance program” means a program offered 11by a manufacturer or an intermediary under contract with a manufacturer through 12which a brand-name drug or a generic drug is provided to a patient at no charge or 13at a discount.SB1149,3,1414(e) “Office” means the office of the commissioner of insurance.SB1149,3,1515(f) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning given in s. 632.865 (1) (c).SB1149,3,1916(g) “Wholesale acquisition cost” means the most recently reported 17manufacturer list or catalog price for a brand-name drug or a generic drug available 18to wholesalers or direct purchasers in the United States, before application of 19discounts, rebates, or reductions in price.SB1149,4,220(2) Price increase or introduction notice; justification report. (a) A 21manufacturer shall notify the department and the office if it is increasing the 22wholesale acquisition cost of a brand-name drug on the market in this state by more 23than 25 percent over a 24-month period or if it intends to introduce to market in 1this state a brand-name drug that has an annual wholesale acquisition cost of 2$30,000 or more.SB1149,4,73(b) A manufacturer shall notify the department and the office if it is 4increasing the wholesale acquisition cost of a generic drug on the market in this 5state by more than 25 percent or by more than $300 during any 12-month period or 6if it intends to introduce to market in this state a generic drug that has an annual 7wholesale acquisition cost of $3,000 or more.SB1149,4,128(c) The manufacturer shall provide the notice under par. (a) or (b) in writing 9at least 30 days before the planned effective date of the cost increase or drug 10introduction and shall provide a justification that includes all documents and 11research related to the manufacturer’s selection of the price increase or 12introduction price and includes a description of all of the following:SB1149,4,13131. The estimated cost-effectiveness of the drug.SB1149,4,15142. The price and effectiveness of similar drugs available in this state and the 15anticipated sales performance of the drug as compared to similar drugs.SB1149,4,18163. The impact of negotiated or mandated discounts to pharmacy benefit 17managers, insurers, and other payers of health care costs on the pricing 18determination for the drug.SB1149,4,2319(d) By March 1 annually, each manufacturer shall report to the department 20and the office the value of price concessions, expressed as a percentage of the 21wholesale acquisition cost, provided to each pharmacy benefit manager for each 22drug sold by the manufacturer in this state for which a notice is required under par. 23(a) or (b) in the previous calendar year.SB1149,5,51(3) Manufacturer-sponsored assistance programs. By March 1 annually, 2each manufacturer of a brand-name drug or generic drug sold in this state shall 3submit to the department and the office a report containing a description of each 4manufacturer-sponsored assistance program in effect during the previous calendar 5year that includes all of the following:SB1149,5,76(a) The criteria for participation in the manufacturer-sponsored assistance 7program and the manufacturer-sponsored assistance program terms.SB1149,5,98(b) The number of prescriptions provided to residents of this state under the 9manufacturer-sponsored assistance program.SB1149,5,1110(c) The total market value of assistance provided to residents of this state 11under the manufacturer-sponsored assistance program.SB1149,5,1612(4) Penalty. The manufacturer shall certify the information reported under 13sub. (2) or (3) as accurate under penalty of perjury. A manufacturer that fails to 14provide the notice or report under sub. (2) or (3) is subject to a forfeiture as 15determined by the department but not to exceed $10,000 for each day the notice or 16report is past due.SB1149,5,1817(5) Posting of report; hearing. (a) The department shall publish on its 18website the justification documentation provided under sub. (2) (c).SB1149,5,2219(b) The department shall analyze the information submitted under subs. (2) 20and (3) and publish a report on its website describing trends in drug pricing. The 21department shall conduct at least one public hearing annually on the findings of 22the report.SB1149,423Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.SB1149,6,41(1) Prescription drug cost reporting by manufacturers. The authorized 2FTE positions for the department of health services are increased by 2.0 GPR 3positions, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (fp), for the 4purpose of administering prescription drug cost reporting under s. 146.901.SB1149,6,55